Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska77-3602
Legislative findings.

The Legislature finds that the benefits of quality child care and early childhood education are indisputable and that a striking connection exists between children’s learning experiences well before kindergarten and their later school success.

Laws 2016, LB889, § 2.